Washington statutes.
RCW 12.36.010

Appeal in small claims action authorized.

Any person wishing to appeal a judgment or decision in a small claims action may, in person or by his or her agent, appeal to the superior court of the county where the judgment was rendered or decision made: PROVIDED, There shall be no appeal allowed unless the amount in controversy, exclusive of costs, exceeds two hundred fifty dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That an appeal from the court's determination or order on a traffic infraction proceeding may be taken only in accordance with RCW 46.63.090(5).

[ 1997 c 352 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 21; 1929 c 58 s 1; RRS s 1910. Prior: 1905 c 20 s 1; 1891 c 29 s 1; Code 1881 s 1858; 1873 p 367 s 156; 1854 p 252 s 160.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.